Alabama, session 2026rs, HB323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
9 Section 1. Section 31-2-41, Code of Alabama 1975, is
10 amended to read as follows:
11 "§31-2-41
12 (a) The Governor may present, at the expense of the
13 state, the following military awards to persons meeting the
14 respective requirements for each award. Each award may be
15 awarded posthumously. Concurrence of the Adjutant General
16 shall be required to present an award unless initiated by the
17 Governor. Recommendations for an award shall contain complete
18 factual information, including dates, as to the service or act
19 for which the award is recommended, with an appropriate
20 proposed citation:
21 (1) Governor's Cross. The Governor's Cross of Alabama
22 is the highest award. The award is presented for exceptional,
23 distinguished, and heroic military or civilian service in
24 support of military or domestic operations to the state.
25 Recipients shall have exhibited exceptional service through
26 personal acts of courage, bravery, or selfless service to the
27 state, including individuals who distinguish themselves by
28 conspicuously and voluntarily exhibiting a high degree of
Page 1

conspicuously and voluntarily exhibiting a high degree of
HB323 Enrolled
29 courage or heroism by risking serious personal injury or death
30 in an attempt to save another individual whose life is in
31 danger during a military or training exercise.
32 (2) Distinguished Service Medal. The Distinguished
33 Service Medal of Alabama is the second highest award. The
34 award is presented for exceptional meritorious and
35 distinguished military or civilian service in support of
36 military operations for individuals serving in positions of
37 great responsibility during times of war or peace.
38 (3) Alabama Commendation Medal. The Alabama
39 Commendation Medal is the third highest award. The award is
40 presented for meritorious and outstanding services and
41 accomplishments. The service may be military performance of
42 duty in time of war or peace. The medal may be awarded to
43 foreign military or civilian personnel who distinguish
44 themselves in a mutually beneficial manner to both the state
45 and the nation.
46 (b) The Adjutant General may present, at the expense of
47 the state, the following military awards to persons meeting
48 the respective requirements for each award. Each award may be
49 awarded posthumously. Recommendations for an award shall
50 contain complete factual information, including dates, as to
51 the service or act for which the award is recommended, with an
52 appropriate proposed citation:
53 (1) Exceptional Service Ribbon. The Exceptional Service
54 Ribbon of Alabama is the fourth highest award. The award is
55 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
56 served an aggregate of 30 days in the state active service for
Page 2

served an aggregate of 30 days in the state active service for
HB323 Enrolled
57 meritorious and outstanding service during times of state
58 emergencies in the support of upholding the law and preserving
59 order, protecting lives and property, and in the relief of
60 civilians in disaster and similar service ordered by the
61 Governor.
62 (2) Faithful Service Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
63 presented toAny any present or former officer, warrant
64 officer, or enlisted man member of the Alabama National Guard
65 who shall have has faithfully served in the National Guard or
66 Naval Militia for an aggregate of six years., shall have
67 conferred upon him the right to wear the Faithful Service
68 Cross, which shall be awarded by order of the Governor and
69 furnished at the expense of the state. Any officer, warrant
70 officer, or enlisted man of the National Guard or Naval
71 Militia of this state who shall have served an aggregate of 30
72 days in the active military service of the state, in the aid
73 of civil authorities in upholding the law and preserving
74 order, protecting lives and property, in the aid and relief of
75 citizens in disaster and other similar service, duly ordered
76 by the Governor, shall have conferred upon him the right to
77 wear the Special Service Medal, which shall be awarded by
78 order of the Governor and furnished at the expense of the
79 state. Any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted man of the
80 National Guard or the Naval Militia of this state who shall
81 have faithfully served in the National Guard or Naval Militia
82 of this state an aggregate of 20 years, shall have conferred
83 upon him the right to wear the Veterans Service Medal, which
84 shall be awarded by order of the Governor and furnished at the
Page 3

shall be awarded by order of the Governor and furnished at the
HB323 Enrolled
85 expense of the state. Service in the organizations of the
86 National Guard or Naval Militia called, drafted, or ordered
87 into the service of the United States shall be credited as
88 active service in the National Guard or Naval Militia of this
89 state for the purposes named in this section, when the soldier
90 or sailor is a member of the National Guard or Naval Militia
91 on the date of federal call, draft, or order, and this
92 provision shall be retroactive so as to include service in any
93 war or during acts of hostility. The Special Service Medal may
94 also be awarded for such special individual acts as the
95 Military Advisory Board may determine to be meritorious and
96 the Governor may approve, without regard to the period of time
97 involved or the date of the act A bronze St. Andrews Cross
98 shall be added to the award for each additional three years
99 served beyond six years to denote the total number of years
100 served by the member.
101 (3) Phenix City Civil Disturbance Medal of Alabama. The
102 award is presented for military duty or civilian service that
103 contributed to the overall effort during the Phenix City civil
104 disturbance that occurred from June 18, 1954 to January 17,
105 1955.
106 (4) Operation Desert Storm Ribbon. The award is
107 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard activated
108 on Title 10 orders who served in direct support of Operation
109 Desert Storm or Operation Desert Shield for at least 30 days.
110 Service members who worked on special duty preparing units for
111 mobilization are not eligible for the award.
112 (5) National Emergency Service Ribbon of Alabama. The
Page 4

(5) National Emergency Service Ribbon of Alabama. The
HB323 Enrolled
113 award includes the Berlin Crisis Clasp and 9-11 Clasp. The
114 Berlin Crisis Clasp is presented to members of the Alabama
115 National Guard called into active federal service during the
116 Berlin Crisis National Emergency, pursuant to Public Law
117 87-117, and Presidential Executive Order 10957, dated August
118 15, 1961. The 9-11 Clasp is presented to members of the
119 Alabama National Guard called to active federal service under
120 Title 10, United States Code for Operation Noble Eagle, Iraqi
121 Freedom, or Enduring Freedom for a minimum of 24 hours in
122 support thereof.
123 (6) Veterans Service Medal of Alabama. The award is
124 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
125 served an aggregate of 21 years in active service, including
126 constructive service in organizations of the National Guard
127 while ordered into the federal service. Qualifying service
128 does not include constructive service in any Reserve
129 Component, except the National Guard. A bronze oak leaf
130 cluster shall be added to the award for each three additional
131 years served beyond 21 years to denote the total number of
132 years served by the member.
133 (7) Special Service Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
134 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
135 served an aggregate of 30 days in the state active service for
136 meritorious and outstanding service during times of state
137 emergencies in the support of upholding the law and preserving
138 order, protecting lives and property, and in the relief of
139 civilians in disaster and similar service ordered by the
140 Governor.
Page 5

Governor.
HB323 Enrolled
141 (8) First Sergeant Service Ribbon. The award is
142 presented to a First Sergeant, Special Duty Identifier 8F000,
143 in recognition of meritorious service who has been assigned to
144 a First Sergeant Unit Manning Position for at least three
145 years and has attended the United States Air Force or Air
146 National Guard First Sergeant Academy. Acting First Sergeants
147 are not eligible for the award.
148 (9) Honor Guard Service Ribbon. The award is presented
149 to all members of the Alabama Army and Air National Guard who
150 perform military funeral honors and who satisfy all Honor
151 Guard expectations, including completion of the requisite
152 number of funeral details.
153 (10) Alabama National Guard Recruiting Ribbon. The
154 award is presented to members of the Alabama National Guard
155 who have excelled as a production recruiter and who meet the
156 qualifications set by the State Military Department.
157 (11) Alabama National Guard Recruiting Lead Generation
158 Ribbon. The award is presented to members of the Alabama
159 National Guard who are not assigned or employed with the
160 Recruiting and Retention Unit in recognition of excellence in
161 recruiting as determined by the State Military Department.
162 (12) Basic Training Ribbon of Alabama. The award is
163 presented to members of the Alabama National Guard who have
164 successfully completed the Basic Training Course after the
165 year 1955.
166 (13) Certificate of Appreciation. The award is
167 presented for domestic and foreign military and civilian
168 persons whose acts of good public and community relations were
Page 6

persons whose acts of good public and community relations were
HB323 Enrolled
169 in the interest of and support the State Military Department.
170 (14) Certificate of Extension. The award is presented
171 to members of the Alabama National Guard for each extension of
172 three years or more after his or her initial term for faithful
173 and honorable service."
174 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
175 1, 2026.
Page 7

1, 2026.
HB323 Enrolled
176
177
178
179
180
181
182
183
184
185 ________________________________________________
186 Speaker of the House of Representatives
187
188
189
190 ________________________________________________
191 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
192
193
194 House of Representatives
195
196 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
197 was passed by the House 12-Feb-26.
198
199 John Treadwell
200 Clerk
201
202
203
204
205
206 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
207
208
209
Page 8